District of Columbia statutes.
6-505

Annual report.

The Mayor shall submit an annual report before April 1st of each year to the Council to advise the public of progress made under the National Flood Control Program.

May 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-64, § 6, 22 DCR 7146
1981 Ed., § 5-305.
1973 Ed., § 5-1105.